ko: 깃발 디자인 테마: 인식 개선/캠페인; 국가/국기; 맞춤형/개인화; 명절/시즌; 군대/재향군인; 모터스포츠/레이싱; 해적/이색; 종교; 학교/대학교; 스포츠 팀; 주/지방/지역; 기타
th: ธีมการออกแบบธง: รณรงค์/การกุศล; ประเทศ/ระดับชาติ; ปรับแต่ง/เป็นส่วนตัว; วันหยุด/ตามฤดูกาล; ทหาร/ทหารผ่านศึก; มอเตอร์สปอร์ต/รถแข่ง; โจรสลัด/แปลกใหม่; ศาสนา; โรงเรียน/มหาวิทยาลัย; ทีมกีฬา; รัฐ/จังหวัด/ภูมิภาค; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Tema dizajna zastave: Podizanje svijesti / cilj; Državna / nacionalna; Prilagođena / personalizirana; Blagdanska / sezonska; Vojna / veteranska; Motosport / utrke; Gusarska / zabavna; Vjerska; Školska / sveučilišna; Sportska momčad; Savezna država / pokrajina / regionalna; Ostalo
cs: Motiv na vlajce: Povědomí/charita; Země/národ; Vlastní/personalizované; Svátky/sezónní; Vojenství/veteráni; Závody/motorsport; Pirátské/zábavné; Náboženské; Škola/univerzita; Sportovní tým; Stát/kraj/region; Jiné
pt-BR: Tema do design da bandeira: Conscientização/Causa; País/Nacional; Customizada/Personalizada; Feriado/Sazonal; Militar/Veteranos; Esporte a motor/Corrida; Pirata/Novidade; Religioso; Escola/Universidade; Equipe esportiva; Estado/Província/Regional; Outros
de: Thema des Flaggendesigns: Aufklärung/Zweck; Land/Nationalität; Benutzerdefiniert/Personalisiert; Feiertage/Saisonal; Militär/Veteranen; Motorsport/Rennen; Pirat/Scherzartikel; Religiös; Schule/Universität; Sportmannschaft; Bundesland/Provinz/Regional; Sonstige
vi: Chủ đề thiết kế cờ: Nhận thức/Phong trào; Quốc gia/Dân tộc; Tùy chỉnh/Cá nhân hóa; Ngày lễ/Theo mùa; Quân đội/Cựu chiến binh; Đua xe/Thể thao tốc độ; Cướp biển/Độc lạ; Tôn giáo; Trường học/Đại học; Đội thể thao; Bang/Tỉnh/Khu vực; Khác
fi: Lipun aihe: Tietoisuus/aate; Maa/kansallinen; Mukautettu/yksilöity; Juhlapyhä/vuodenaika; Sotilas/veteraani; Moottoriurheilu/kilpa-ajo; Merirosvo/erikoisuus; Uskonnollinen; Koulu/yliopisto; Urheilujoukkue; Osavaltio/maakunta/alueellinen; Muu
sv: Designtema för flagga: Medvetenhet/hjärtesak; Land/nationell; Anpassad/personlig; Högtid/säsong; Militär/veteran; Motorsport/racing; Pirat/skoj; Religiös; Skola/universitet; Idrottslag; Stat/provins/regional; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tematika zasnove zastave: Ozaveščanje/Namen; Država/Nacionalno; Po meri/Prilagojeno; Prazniki/Sezonsko; Vojska/Veterani; Motošport/Dirkanje; Pirati/Zabavno; Versko; Šola/Univerza; Športna ekipa; Država/Provinca/Regionalno; Drugo
bg-BG: Тема за дизайн на флаг: Информираност / кауза; Държавен / национален; По поръчка / персонализиран; Празничен / сезонен; Военен / ветерански; Моторни спортове / състезателен; Пиратски / забавен; Религиозен; Училищен / университетски; Спортен отбор; Щатски / провинциален / регионален; Друго
da: Flagdesigntema: Bevågenhed/sag; Land/national; Specialdesignet/personlig; Helligdag/sæson; Militær/veteran; Motorsport/racerløb; Pirat/spøg; Religiøs; Skole/universitet; Sportshold; Stat/provins/regional; Andet
pt-PT: Tema de desenho de bandeira: Consciencialização/causa; País/nacional; Personalizado; Feriado/sazonal; Militar/veterano; Desportos motorizados/corridas; Pirata/novidade; Religioso; Escola/universidade; Equipa desportiva; Estado/província/regional; Outro
it: Tema di design delle bandiere: Sensibilizzazione/causa; Paese/nazione; Su misura/personalizzato; Festività/stagionale; Militare/veterano; Sport motoristici/corse; Pirata/novità; Religioso; Scuola/università; Squadra sportiva; Stato/provincia/regione; Altro
nl: Ontwerpthema vlag: Bewustwording/Goed doel; Land/Nationaal; Aangepast/Gepersonaliseerd; Feestdag/Seizoensgebonden; Militair/Veteraan; Motorsport/Racing; Piraat/Thema; Religieus; School/Universiteit; Sportteam; Staat/Provincie/Regionaal; Overige
sk-SK: Téma dizajnu vlajky: Povedomie/kauza; Krajina/národ; Vlastné/prispôsobené; Sviatky/sezónne; Vojenské/veteráni; Motoršport/závodné; Pirátske/žartovné; Náboženské; Škola/univerzita; Športový tím; Štát/provincia/región; Iné
tr: Bayrak tasarımı teması: Farkındalık/Amaç; Ülke/Ulusal; Özel/Kişiselleştirilmiş; Tatil/Mevsimsel; Askeri/Gazi; Motor Sporları/Yarış; Korsan/İlginç; Dini; Okul/Üniversite; Spor takımı; Eyalet/İl/Bölgesel; Diğer
lt-LT: Vėliavos dizaino tema: Sąmoningumo / paramos; Šalies / nacionalinė; Individualus / personalizuotas; Šventinis / sezoninis; Kariškių / veteranų; Automobilių sportas / lenktynės; Piratų / suvenyrinis; Religinis; Mokyklos / universiteto; Sporto komandos; Valstijos / provincijos / regioninis; Kita
nb: Flaggdesigntema: Bevissthet / sak; Land / nasjonalitet; Egendefinert / personlig; Høytid / sesong; Militær / veteran; Motorsport / racing; Sjørøver / moro; Religiøs; Skole / universitet; Idrettslag; Stat / fylke / region; Annet
el: Θέμα σχεδιασμού σημαίας: Ευαισθητοποίησης/Σκοπού; Χώρας/Εθνική; Προσαρμοσμένη/Εξατομικευμένη; Γιορτών/Εποχιακή; Στρατιωτική/Βετεράνων; Μηχανοκίνητου αθλητισμού/Αγώνων; Πειρατική/Πρωτότυπη; Θρησκευτική; Σχολείου/Πανεπιστημίου; Αθλητικής ομάδας; Πολιτείας/Επαρχίας/Τοπική; Άλλο
zh-TW: 旗幟設計主題: 倡議 / 公益; 國家 / 民族; 自訂 / 客製化; 節日 / 季節性; 軍隊 / 退伍軍人; 賽車運動 / 賽事; 海盜 / 趣味新奇; 宗教; 學校 / 大學; 運動隊伍; 州 / 省 / 地區; 其他
pl: Szablon projektu flagi: Kampanie społeczne/świadomość; Kraje/narodowe; Niestandardowe/personalizowane; Święta/sezonowe; Wojskowe/weterani; Sporty motorowe/wyścigi; Pirackie/śmieszne; Religijne; Szkolne/uczelniane; Drużyny sportowe; Stanowe/wojewódzkie/regionalne; Inny
en: Flag design theme: Awareness/Cause; Country/National; Custom/Personalized; Holiday/Seasonal; Military/Veteran; Motorsports/Racing; Pirate/Novelty; Religious; School/University; Sports team; State/Province/Regional; Other
ro-RO: Temă de design de steag: Conștientizare/Cauză; Țară/Național; Personalizat; Sărbători/Sezon; Armată/Veterani; Sporturi cu motor/Curse; Pirați/Noutate; Religios; Școală/Universitate; Echipă sportivă; Stat/Provincie/Regional; Altele
ru: Тематика дизайна флага: Информирование/общественные движения; Государственный/национальный; Индивидуальный/персонализированный; Праздничный/сезонный; Военный/ветеранский; Автоспорт/гонки; Пиратский/сувенирный; Религиозный; Школьный/университетский; Спортивная команда; Штат/провинция/регион; Другое
zh-CN: 旗帜设计主题: 意识觉醒/公益; 国家; 定制/个性化; 节日/季节性; 军事/退伍军人; 赛车运动/竞速; 海盗/新奇; 宗教; 学校/大学; 运动队; 州/省/地区; 其他
es: Tema de diseño de banderas: Concienciación/causa; País/nacional; Personalizado; Festivo/estacional; Militar/veterano; Deportes de motor/carreras; Pirata/novedad; Religioso; Escuela/universidad; Equipo deportivo; Estado/provincia/regional; Otro
hu: Zászlóminta témája: Figyelemfelhívás / Ügy; Ország / Nemzeti; Egyedi / Személyre szabott; Ünnepi / Szezonális; Katonai / Veterán; Motorsport / Verseny; Kalóz / Különleges; Vallási; Iskolai / Egyetemi; Sportcsapat; Állam / Tartomány / Régió; Egyéb
ja: 旗のデザインテーマ: 啓発/社会運動; 国/国家; カスタム/パーソナライズ; 祝日/季節; 軍隊/退役軍人; モータースポーツ/レーシング; 海賊/ノベルティ; 宗教; 学校/大学; スポーツチーム; 州/都道府県/地域; その他
fr: Thème du drapeau: Sensibilisation/Cause; Pays/National; Sur mesure/Personnalisé; Fêtes/Saisonnier; Militaire/Anciens combattants; Sports automobiles/Courses; Pirate/Fantaisie; Religieux; École/Université; Équipe sportive; État/Province/Régional; Autre